Utah statutes.
41-1a-203.   Prerequisites for registration, transfer of ownership, or registration renewal.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided, prior to registration of a vehicle, an owner shall:

(a)  obtain an identification number inspection under Section 41-1a-204;

(b)  obtain a safety inspection certificate, if required in the current year, as provided under Sections 41-1a-205 and 53-8-205;

(c)  obtain a certificate of emissions inspection, if required in the current year, as provided under Section 41-6a-1642;

(d)  pay property taxes, the in lieu fee, or receive a property tax clearance under Section 41-1a-206 or 41-1a-207;

(e)  pay the automobile driver education tax required by Section 41-1a-208;

(f)  pay the applicable registration fee under Part 12, Fee and Tax Requirements;

(g)  pay the uninsured motorist identification fee under Section 41-1a-1218, if applicable; 

(h)  pay the motor carrier fee under Section 41-1a-1219, if applicable;

(i)  pay any applicable local emissions compliance fee under Section 41-1a-1223; and

(j)  pay the taxes applicable under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.

(2)  In addition to the requirements in Subsection (1), an owner whose vehicle has not been previously registered or that is currently registered under a previous owner's name shall also apply for a valid certificate of title in the owner's name prior to registration.

(3)  A new registration, transfer of ownership, or registration renewal under Section 73-18-7 may not be issued for a vessel or outboard motor that is subject to the title provisions of this chapter unless a certificate of title has been or is in the process of being issued in the same owner's name.

(4)  A new registration, transfer of ownership, or registration renewal under Section 41-22-3 may not be issued for an off-highway vehicle that is subject to the titling provisions of this chapter unless a certificate of title has been or is in the process of being issued in the same owner's name.

